en: 50-63% unsalted vegetable fat high in omega 3, 50-63% unsalted margarine high in omega 3
fr: Matière grasse végétale allégée à 50-63% de matières grasses riche en oméga 3, margarine douce

en: 50-63% unsalted vegetable fat with plant sterols esters, 50-63% unsalted margarine with plant sterols esters
fr: Matière grasse végétale douce allégée à 50-63% aux esters de stérol végétal, Margarine douce allégée à 50-63% aux esters de stérol végétal

en: 50-63% unsalted vegetable fat, 50-63% unsalted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale douce allégée à 50-63%, Margarine douce allégée à 50-63%
zh: 50-63% 无盐植物脂肪

en: Solid vegetable fat for frying, margarine for frying
fr: Matière grasse solide pour friture, graisse végétale solide pour friture, margarine pour friture

en: Shea butter
bg: Масло от ший
de: Sheabutter
es: Mantecas de karité
fr: Beurres de karité
hr: Shea maslac
it: Burro di karité
ja: シアバター
lt: Taukmedžio sviestas
nl: Kariteboters

en: Vegetable oils, Plant-based oils
bg: Растителни масла
ca: Olis vegetals
cs: Rostlinné oleje
da: Vegetabilske olier, Planteolier
de: Pflanzenöle
es: Aceites vegetales, Aceites de origen vegetal
fi: kasvisöljyt
fr: Huiles, huiles végétales
he: שמנים מן הצומח
hr: biljna ulja, biljne ulje, ulja ulje
hu: Nővényi olajok, Nővény alapú olajok
it: Olio vegetale
ja: 植物油
lt: Augaliniai aliejai
nl: Plantaardige oliën, Slaolies
pl: Oleje roślinne, oleje pochodzenia roślinnego
pt: Olios vegetais, olios baseados om plantas
ru: Масло растительное, Растительное масло
sv: Vegetabiliska oljor, vegetabilisk olja
th: น้ำมันพืช
tr: Bitkisel yağlar
zh: 植物油

en: Flavoured oils
da: Olier med smag
de: Aromatisierte Öle
es: Aceites aromatizados
fr: Huiles aromatisées
hr: Aromatizirana ulja
it: Oli aromatizzati
ja: 香味油, 調味油, 風味付けオイル, シーズニングオイル, フレーバーオイル
nl: Gearomatiseerde oliën

en: Citrus flavoured oils
fr: Huiles aromatisées à la citron
hr: Ulja s okusom citrusa
nl: Gearomatiseerde oliën met citrus

en: Spiced flavoured oils
fr: Huiles aromatisées épicées, Huiles pimentées
hr: Začinjena aromatizirana ulja
nl: Pikant gearomatiseerde oliën

en: Truffle flavoured oils
fr: Huiles aromatisées à la truffe
hr: Ulja s okusom tartufa
ja: トリュフオイル
nl: Gearomatiseerde oliën met truffel

en: Herb flavoured oils
fr: Huiles aromatisées aux herbes
hr: Ulja s okusom bilja
ja: ハーブオイル
nl: Gearomatiseerde oliën met kruiden

en: Apricot kernel oil
fr: Huile d'amandes d'abricot

en: Argan oils
bg: Олио от арган
de: Arganöle
es: Aceites de argán
fr: Huiles d'argan, Huile d'argane
hr: Arganova ulja
it: Olio di argan
ja: アルガン油
lt: Argano aliejai
nl: Arganoliën
sv: Arganoljor, Arganolja

en: Borage seed oils, Borage oils
es: Aceites de borraja
fr: Huiles de graines de bourrache
hr: Ulja sjemenki boražine
it: Olio di semi di borragine
nl: Bernagie-oliën, Borage-oliën

en: Frying oil
da: Fritureolier
fr: Huile pour friture
hr: Ulje za prženje
ja: 揚げ油

en: Cereal oils
de: Getreideöle
es: Aceites de cereales
fi: viljaöljyt
fr: Huiles de céréales
hr: Ulja žitarica
it: Olio di cereali
lt: Grūdų aliejai
nl: Tarwe-oliën
zh: 谷物油

en: Amaranth oils
es: Aceites de amaranto
fr: Huiles d'amarante
hr: Ulja amaranta
lt: Amarantų aliejus
nl: Amarantoliën
zh: 苋菜油

en: Corn oils, Maize oil, Corn oil
bg: Царевично олио
de: Maiskeimöle
es: Aceites de maíz, Aceites de germen de maíz
fr: Huiles de maïs, Huiles de germe de maïs, Huile de maïs
hr: Kukuruzna ulja
it: Olio di mais, Olio di semi di mais
ja: とうもろこし油, コーン油
lt: Kukurūzų aliejus
nl: Maïs-oliën, Maiskiemolie
zh: 玉米油

en: Linseed oils, Flaxseed oils, Flax oil
de: Leinsamenöle, Leinöle
es: Aceites de lino, Aceites de linaza
fr: Huiles de lin
hr: Lanena ulja
it: Olio di lino, Olio di semi di lino
ja: アマニ油
lt: Linų sėmenų aliejai
nl: Lijnzaadoliën
sv: Linoljor, Linolja
zh: 亚麻籽油

en: Camelina oils
de: Leindotteröle
es: Aceites de camelina
fr: Huiles de cameline
hr: Ulja kameline
it: Olio di camelina
nl: Kamelinoliën